Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5977.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 40. (1) A home-schooled student seeking a level 1 or 2 graduated driver license under section 310e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310e, is exempt from teen driver training under this act if all of the following requirements are met: (a) The home-schooled student has completed a curriculum administered by a parent or legal guardian that meets the minimum instructional and driving standards set by the secretary of state. (b) On completion of a curriculum administered by the parent or legal guardian under subdivision (a), the parent or legal guardian submits, on a form created and approved by the secretary of state, a signed certificate to the secretary of state that certifies all of the following: (i) The home-schooled student has completed the instructional and driving curriculum. (ii) One of the following: (A) For a level 1 graduated driver license, the home-schooled student has completed a minimum of 6 hours of on-the-road driving time with the instructor, parent, or legal guardian. (B) For a level 2 graduated driver license, the home-schooled student has accumulated a total of not less than 50 hours of behind-the-wheel experience, including, except as otherwise provided in section 310e(5)(d) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310e, not less than 10 nighttime hours. (iii) The instruction was provided in good faith and in accordance with the secretary of state guidelines. (2) On receipt of a home-schooled driver education certificate under subsection (1)(b), the secretary of state shall send a confirmation of receipt to the parent or legal guardian that submitted the certificate. Not more than 10 business days after the secretary of state received the certificate, the secretary of state shall either approve or reject the certificate and send written notification of that decision to the applicant. If the secretary of state rejects the certificate, the written notification sent to the applicant must include a list of specific curable defects for the applicant to address. (3) If the secretary of state does not provide a timely written response either approving or rejecting the certificate under subsection (2), or the written notification rejecting the certificate under subsection (2) does not contain a list of specific curable defects for the applicant to address, the certificate must be considered approved, and the student must be determined to have met the applicable driver education requirement. (4) The secretary of state shall keep a copy of a driver education certificate submitted under subsection (2) for at least 3 years after the date that the certificate is submitted. (5) A parent or legal guardian who submits a certificate in good faith and in substantial compliance with this section is immune from both of the following: (a) Civil liability, including, but not limited to, civil liability in an action brought by the secretary of state. (b) Any administrative penalty or delay in processing a graduated driver license due solely to the secretary of state's failure to process or record a certification under subsection (2). (6) The secretary of state shall not impose additional documentation or procedural requirements on a home-schooled student beyond those explicitly required under this section and section 310e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310e, to receive a driver license. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Business day" means a day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any legal holiday. (b) "Home-schooled student" means a child being educated at the child's home by the child's parent or legal guardian in accordance with section 1561(4) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1561. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5978 (request no. H03572'25 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.